Mississippi, session 2026, HB1395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-28-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-28-61.  (1)  Whenever a school district decides to sell or lease one or more instructional buildings that are part of a public school facility or property which is no longer in use or has been closed, a charter school has a right of first refusal to purchase or lease, at or below fair market value * * *a, the instructional building or buildings of the closed public school facility * * *or property or unused portions of * * *a the public school facility * * *or if the property is situated in the school district in which the charter school is located * * * if the school district decides to sell or lease the public school facility or property.  A charter school must notify the school district of its decision to exercise its right under this subsection before the expiration of ninety (90) days after the property becomes available; failure to give the notice to the school district within the ninety-day period shall be deemed to be a rejection of the offer to purchase or lease the property.  If a conversion charter school application is successful, the local school district owning the conversion charter school's facility must offer to lease or sell the building to the conversion charter school at or below fair market value. (2)  A charter school may negotiate and contract at or below fair market value with a school district, state institution of higher learning, public community or junior college, or any other public or for-profit or nonprofit private entity for the use of a facility for a school building. (3)  Public entities, including, but not limited to, libraries, community service organizations, museums, performing arts venues, theatres, cinemas, churches, community and junior colleges, colleges and universities, may provide space to charter schools within their facilities under their preexisting zoning and land use designations. SECTION 2.  Section 37-7-455, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-7-455.  (1)  Any land, buildings or other property that is not used for school purposes and which is not needed in the operation of the schools of the district may be sold in the manner established in this section but, in the case of an instructional building or buildings, only after each charter school located in the school district has notified, before the expiration of ninety (90) days, the school board that it is not exercising its right of first refusal on the property, as provided under Section 37-28-61.  The failure of a charter school to give notice to the school district within the ninety-day period shall be deemed to be a rejection of the offer to purchase or lease the property. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, all such land, buildings or other property shall be sold only after the receipt of sealed bids therefor after the time and place of making such sale has been duly advertised in some newspaper having a general circulation in the county in which the property is located once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks with the first publication to be made not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the date upon which such bids are to be received and opened.  The property shall be sold to the highest and best bidder for cash, but the school board shall have the right to reject any and all bids.  If the property is not sold pursuant to such advertisement, the school board, by resolution, may set a date for an open meeting of the school board to be held within sixty (60) days after the date upon which the bids were opened.  At the meeting held pursuant to such resolution, the school board may sell by auction the property for a consideration not less than the highest sealed bid previously received pursuant to the advertisement.  At the meeting, any interested party may bid for cash, and the property shall be sold to the highest and best bidder for cash, but the school board shall have the right to reject any and all bids.  The school board may require a written confirmation of bids received at such called meeting before selling the property at auction, but it shall not be necessary that sealed bids be received before conducting the auction. (2)  As an alternative to the procedures established under subsection (1) of this section, the school board of a school district may elect, in its discretion, to sell by public auction any property, other than real property or buildings of the school district, which is not used for school or related school purposes and not needed in the operation of the schools, according to the procedure in Section 17-25-25, except as otherwise provided under Section 37-7-459. (3)  As an alternative to the procedures established under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the county board of education of a county having a population in excess of ten thousand (10,000) according to the 2000 decennial census and in which U.S. Highway 45 intersects with Mississippi Highway 16, may  elect, in its discretion, to transfer and sell the buildings of the school district and the real property upon which the buildings are located which are not used as school facilities or for school-related purposes and not needed in the operation of the schools, after advertising for and receiving competitive bids for the sale of such property.  If any bid is offered by a nonprofit 501(c)(3) entity which has made substantial improvements to the buildings, the fair market value of the improvements shall be deemed to be consideration for, a part of, the bid offered by the entity.  In this case, the school board shall enter a finding on its minutes that the nonprofit entity has made substantial improvements to the property and the property is no longer needed for school district purposes. (4)  When the sale of such property is authorized and approved by the school board, the president of the school board shall be authorized and empowered to execute a conveyance of the property upon the terms and for the consideration fixed by the board.  The school board shall reserve unto the district all oil, gas and minerals in, on or under the land, and all proceeds derived from royalties upon the reserved mineral interests shall be used as provided by Section 37-7-457. SECTION 3.  Section 37-7-477, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-7-477.  (1)  Unless a school board retains a partial interest, or undivided interest or other ownership interest in the school property being conveyed, any instrument conveying or leasing any school property under the provisions of Sections 37-7-471 through 37-7-483, shall provide that the title to such property shall * * *automatically revert to the school district, if such property shall cease to be used for the purpose for which it * * *is was originally conveyed or leased or for an alternative purposed approved by the school board at the time of the proposed conveyance or lease in accordance with this section.  If any alternative use of the school property is allowed, the instrument of conveyance shall include procedures that must be followed requiring the grantee or lessee to present the alternative use to the school board for consideration and to obtain school board approval for the alternative use specified therein.  The school board may approve the alternative use if the board finds and makes a determination, by resolution duly adopted and lawfully spread upon its minutes that:  (i) the school property is not needed for school or related purposes and (ii) the proposed alternative use is an authorized use allowed by Section 37-7-473. Otherwise, if the property ceases to be used for the purpose for which it was originally conveyed, title to the property shall revert to the school district. Said instrument shall also contain the condition that the grantee or lessee shall keep and maintain said property in a good state of repair and shall keep said property insured in a reasonable amount against loss by fire, windstorm and other hazards.  Upon breach of any of said conditions, the school board shall have the right of reentry upon said property as for condition broken and shall have the power and authority to bring and maintain such actions as shall be necessary and appropriate for such purpose in its own name.  However, the provisions of this section shall not be mandatory in the event that the school board retains a partial interest, or undivided interest or other ownership interest in the school property being conveyed. (2)  The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not be applicable to any transaction of acquisition by the United States, by purchase, condemnation, conveyance or otherwise of any school property or any other real property possessed by the state as authorized by Section 3-5-1. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.